District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.06

Limitation on Commission action.

If the Commission issues a financing order, the Commission, in the exercise of its powers and carrying out its duties, may not thereafter consider:

(1)

The Bonds described in the financing order to be the debt of the electric company;

(2)

The DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges approved in the financing order to be revenue of the electric company or the property or an asset of the electric company, or the payment of such collections to the trustee to be an expense of the electric company; or

(3)

The DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Costs or the financing or other costs incurred by the District in connection with Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter to be an obligation of the electric company or to be costs included in the cost of service of the electric company.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 306, 61 DCR 1882